Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-4,149.02
Commercial drivers' licenses;
driving skills examination; exemption for driver with military commercial
motor vehicle experience; conditions and limitations; applicant; certification.

A commercial driver's
license examiner shall not require the driving skills examination for a commercial
motor vehicle driver with military commercial motor vehicle experience who
is currently licensed at the time of his or her application for a commercial
driver's license and may substitute an applicant's driving record in combination
with certain driving experience. The department may impose conditions and
limitations as allowed under 49 C.F.R. 383 to restrict the applicants from
whom the department may accept alternative requirements for the driving skills
examination authorized in section 60-4,155. Such conditions and limitations
shall require at least the following:

(1) An applicant must
certify that, during the two-year period immediately prior to applying for
a commercial driver's license, he or she:

(a) Has not had more than one operator's license,
except for a military operator's license;

(b) Has not had any operator's license suspended,
revoked, or canceled;

(c)
Has not had any convictions for any type of motor vehicle for the disqualifying
offenses contained in 49 C.F.R. 383.51(b);

(d) Has not had more than one conviction for any type
of motor vehicle for serious traffic violations contained in 49 C.F.R. 383.51(c);

(e) Has not had any conviction
for a violation of military, state, or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with
any traffic accident; and

(f) Has no record of an accident in which he or she
was at fault; and

(2)
An applicant must provide evidence and certify that he or she:

(a) Is regularly employed
or was regularly employed within the last ninety days in a military position
requiring operation of a commercial motor vehicle;

(b) Was exempted from the commercial
driver's license requirements in 49 C.F.R. 383.3(c); and

(c) Was operating a vehicle
representative of the commercial motor vehicle the driver applicant operates
or expects to operate, for at least two years immediately preceding discharge
from the military.

Laws 2014, LB983, § 40.